Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
Colorado Corporation Code

Editor's note:

(1) Articles 1 to 10 were numbered as articles 1 to 10 of chapter 31, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to these articles prior to their repeal in 1993, effective July 1, 1994, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. A comparative table showing the relocation of subject matter to articles 101 to 117 as a result of the recodification of the Colorado Corporation Code in 1993 is found in the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

(2) Current provisions concerning the "Colorado Business Corporation Act" are located in articles 101 to 117 of this title.